Florida, session 2026, SB1440.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 84 85 Section 1.âSubsection (4) is added to section 494.00125, 86 Florida Statutes, to read: 87 494.00125âPublic records exemptions.â 88 (4)âINFORMATION SECURITY; CYBERSECURITY.âAll information 89 received by the office pursuant to s. 494.00123, or received by 90 the office as result of an investigation by the office or a law 91 enforcement agency of a cybersecurity event pursuant to s. 92 494.00123, is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 93 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution, until such time as the 94 investigation is completed or ceases to be active. The public 95 records exemption of the information received by the office 96 under this subsection shall be construed in conformity with s. 97 119.071(2)(c). This subsection is subject to the Open Government 98 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 99 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 100 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 101 Section 2.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 102 necessity that information on cybersecurity events submitted to 103 or obtained by the Office of Financial Regulation pursuant to s. 104 494.00123, Florida Statutes, or as a result of an investigation 105 by the office which involve information security programs of 106 loan originators, mortgage brokers, and mortgage lenders and 107 nonpublic personal data of customers of such loan originators, 108 mortgage brokers, and mortgage lenders be made confidential and 109 exempt from public disclosure. 110 (2)(a)âPremature or unrestricted release of information on 111 cybersecurity events, as defined in s. 494.00123(1), Florida 112 Statutes, could compromise ongoing investigations, expose system 113 vulnerabilities, and hinder the officeâs ability to protect 114 consumers and regulate financial institutions effectively. 115 Disclosure of such information could also place affected 116 individuals at heightened risk of identity theft and financial 117 fraud while revealing trade secrets, proprietary data, and 118 technical safeguards that could be exploited by malicious 119 actors. 120 (b)âProtecting information on cybersecurity events ensures 121 that entities cooperate fully with regulators, encourages 122 accurate reporting of security incidents, and maintains the 123 overall integrity of the financial and cybersecurity 124 infrastructure of this state. 125 (3)âIt is therefore a public necessity that all information 126 received by the office pursuant to s. 494.00123, Florida 127 Statutes, or through an investigation by the office or a law 128 enforcement agency of a cybersecurity event pursuant to s. 129 494.00123, Florida Statutes, be made confidential and exempt 130 from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of 131 the State Constitution. 132 Section 3.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 133 517.2015, Florida Statutes, is amended, and subsection (4) is 134 added to that section, to read: 135 517.2015âConfidentiality of information relating to 136 investigations and examinations.â 137 (1) 138 (b)âExcept as necessary for the office to enforce the 139 provisions of this chapter, a consumer complaint, a report of 140 financial exploitation, and other information relative to an 141 investigation or examination shall remain confidential and 142 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 143 Constitution after the investigation or examination is completed 144 or ceases to be active to the extent disclosure would: 145 1.âJeopardize the integrity of another active investigation 146 or examination. 147 2.âReveal the name, address, telephone number, social 148 security number, or any other identifying number or information 149 of any complainant, customer, specified adult as defined in s. 150 517.34(1), or account holder. 151 3.âDisclose the identity of a confidential source. 152 4.âDisclose investigative techniques or procedures. 153 5.âReveal a trade secret as defined in s. 688.002. 154 6.âDisclose financial information or personal health or 155 medical conditions of a complainant, customer, or specified 156 adult as defined in s. 517.34(1). 157 (4)âParagraph (1)(b) is subject to the Open Government 158 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and is repealed 159 October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through 160 reenactment by the Legislature. 161 Section 4.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 162 necessity that information in the possession of the Office of 163 Financial Regulation arising from a report of financial 164 exploitation under s. 517.34, Florida Statutes, concerning the 165 financial exploitation of specified adults be made confidential 166 and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 167 Article I of the State Constitution. The exemptions from public 168 records requirements provided under s. 517.2015 (1)(b), Florida 169 Statutes, are necessary to ensure the officeâs ability to 170 administer its regulatory duties while preventing unwarranted 171 damage to the good name or reputation of a specified adult or 172 jeopardizing his or her safety. Such disclosure could also 173 result in the spread of inaccurate information, which could harm 174 the specified adult. The Legislature finds that the release of 175 information in a report of financial exploitation under s. 176 517.34, Florida Statutes, which contains sensitive personal 177 nonfinancial information related to the physical and mental 178 health or condition of the exploited person could result in the 179 disclosure of personal health and medical conditions, as well as 180 the further targeting and exploitation of the specified adult. 181 Section 5.âPresent subsection (7) of section 560.129, 182 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (9), new 183 subsections (7) and (8) are added to that section, and 184 subsections (1), (2), and (4) of that section are reenacted, to 185 read: 186 560.129âConfidentiality.â 187 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section, all 188 information concerning an investigation or examination conducted 189 by the office pursuant to this chapter, including any customer 190 complaint received by the office or the Department of Financial 191 Services, is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 192 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until the investigation 193 or examination ceases to be active. For purposes of this 194 section, an investigation or examination is considered âactiveâ 195 so long as the office or any other administrative, regulatory, 196 or law enforcement agency of any jurisdiction is proceeding with 197 reasonable dispatch and has a reasonable good faith belief that 198 action may be initiated by the office or other administrative, 199 regulatory, or law enforcement agency. 200 (2)âAll information obtained by the office in the course of 201 its investigation or examination which is a trade secret, as 202 defined in s. 688.002, or which is personal financial 203 information shall remain confidential and exempt from s. 204 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. If any 205 administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding against a money 206 services business, its authorized vendor, or an affiliated party 207 is initiated and the office seeks to use matter that a licensee 208 believes to be a trade secret or personal financial information, 209 such records shall be subject to an in camera review by the 210 administrative law judge, if the matter is before the Division 211 of Administrative Hearings, or a judge of any court of this 212 state, any other state, or the United States, as appropriate, 213 for the purpose of determining if the matter is a trade secret 214 or is personal financial information. If it is determined that 215 the matter is a trade secret, the matter shall remain 216 confidential. If it is determined that the matter is personal 217 financial information, the matter shall remain confidential 218 unless the administrative law judge or judge determines that, in 219 the interests of justice, the matter should become public. 220 (4)âExcept as necessary for the office or any other 221 administrative, regulatory, or law enforcement agency of any 222 jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this chapter or the 223 law of any other state or the United States, a consumer 224 complaint and other information concerning an investigation or 225 examination shall remain confidential and exempt from s. 226 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution after 227 the investigation or examination ceases to be active to the 228 extent that disclosure would: 229 (a)âJeopardize the integrity of another active 230 investigation; 231 (b)âReveal personal financial information; 232 (c)âReveal the identity of a confidential source; or 233 (d)âReveal investigative techniques or procedures. 234 (7)âAll information received by the office related to 235 cybersecurity incidents, security breaches, or an information 236 security program notification or required submission pursuant to 237 s. 560.1311 or as a result of an investigation by the office or 238 a law enforcement agency is confidential and exempt from s. 239 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 240 Information received as a result of an investigation by the 241 office or a law enforcement agency shall remain confidential and 242 exempt until such time as the investigation is completed or 243 ceases to be active. Information that is exempt as a result of 244 an investigation shall be construed in conformity with s. 245 119.071(2)(c). This subsection is subject to the Open Government 246 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 247 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 248 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 249 (8)âSubsections (1), (2), and (4) are subject to the Open 250 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 251 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and 252 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 253 Section 6.â(1)âThe Legislature finds all of the following: 254 (a)âIt is a public necessity that all information 255 concerning an investigation or examination of a money services 256 business conducted by the Office of Financial Regulation 257 pursuant to chapter 560, Florida Statutes, including a consumer 258 complaint, be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 259 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 260 Constitution until the investigation or examination ceases to be 261 active. The Legislature further finds that such information 262 should remain confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida 263 Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution 264 after the investigation or examination ceases to be active if 265 its disclosure would jeopardize the officeâs investigations by 266 revealing techniques or procedures or otherwise reveal 267 information that is being used in another investigation, or if 268 disclosure would reveal personal financial information or a 269 confidential source. 270 (b)âIt is a public necessity that trade secrets or personal 271 financial information obtained by the office in the course of an 272 investigation or examination pursuant to chapter 560, Florida 273 Statutes, be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 274 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 275 Constitution, unless an administrative law judge or circuit 276 judge determines that the release of personal financial 277 information to the public is in the interest of justice. 278 (c)âIt is a public necessity that information related to 279 cybersecurity incidents, data breaches, and information security 280 programs submitted to or obtained by the Office of Financial 281 Regulation be made confidential and exempt from public 282 disclosure. 283 (2)âInformation specified in subsection (1) is held by the 284 office in conjunction with its investigations and examinations 285 of money services businesses, which includes documents relating 286 to cybersecurity incidents, data breaches, and information 287 security programs. Premature or unrestricted release of such 288 information could compromise ongoing investigations, expose 289 system vulnerabilities, and hinder the officeâs ability to 290 protect consumers and regulate money services businesses 291 effectively. Disclosure could also place affected individuals at 292 heightened risk of identity theft and financial fraud while 293 revealing trade secrets, proprietary data, and technical 294 safeguards that could be exploited by malicious actors. 295 Protecting this information ensures that entities cooperate 296 fully with regulators, encourages accurate reporting of security 297 incidents, and maintains the overall integrity of this stateâs 298 financial and cybersecurity infrastructure. 299 Section 7.âEffective on the same date that SB 198 or SB 300 314, 2026 Regular Session, or similar legislation takes effect, 301 if such legislation is adopted in the same legislative session 302 or an extension thereof and becomes a law, present subsection 303 (7) of section 560.129, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as 304 subsection (8), a new subsection (7) is added to that section, 305 and subsections (1), (2), and (4) of that section are reenacted, 306 to read: 307 560.129âConfidentiality.â 308 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section, all 309 information concerning an investigation or examination conducted 310 by the office pursuant to this chapter, including any customer 311 complaint received by the office or the Department of Financial 312 Services, is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 313 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until the investigation 314 or examination ceases to be active. For purposes of this 315 section, an investigation or examination is considered âactiveâ 316 so long as the office or any other administrative, regulatory, 317 or law enforcement agency of any jurisdiction is proceeding with 318 reasonable dispatch and has a reasonable good faith belief that 319 action may be initiated by the office or other administrative, 320 regulatory, or law enforcement agency. 321 (2)âAll information obtained by the office in the course of 322 its investigation or examination which is a trade secret, as 323 defined in s. 688.002, or which is personal financial 324 information shall remain confidential and exempt from s. 325 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. If any 326 administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding against a money 327 services business, its authorized vendor, or an affiliated party 328 is initiated and the office seeks to use matter that a licensee 329 believes to be a trade secret or personal financial information, 330 such records shall be subject to an in camera review by the 331 administrative law judge, if the matter is before the Division 332 of Administrative Hearings, or a judge of any court of this 333 state, any other state, or the United States, as appropriate, 334 for the purpose of determining if the matter is a trade secret 335 or is personal financial information. If it is determined that 336 the matter is a trade secret, the matter shall remain 337 confidential. If it is determined that the matter is personal 338 financial information, the matter shall remain confidential 339 unless the administrative law judge or judge determines that, in 340 the interests of justice, the matter should become public. 341 (4)âExcept as necessary for the office or any other 342 administrative, regulatory, or law enforcement agency of any 343 jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this chapter or the 344 law of any other state or the United States, a consumer 345 complaint and other information concerning an investigation or 346 examination shall remain confidential and exempt from s. 347 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution after 348 the investigation or examination ceases to be active to the 349 extent that disclosure would: 350 (a)âJeopardize the integrity of another active 351 investigation; 352 (b)âReveal personal financial information; 353 (c)âReveal the identity of a confidential source; or 354 (d)âReveal investigative techniques or procedures. 355 (7)âSubsections (1), (2), and (4) are subject to the Open 356 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 357 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and 358 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 359 Section 8.âEffective upon becoming a law, notwithstanding 360 section 7 of this act, if section 5 of this act becomes law, the 361 amendment to s. 560.129(7), Florida Statutes, in section 7 of 362 this act may not take effect. 363 Section 9.â(1)âThe Legislature finds all of the following: 364 (a)âIt is a public necessity that all information 365 concerning an investigation or examination of a money services 366 business conducted by the Office of Financial Regulation 367 pursuant to chapter 560, Florida Statutes, including a consumer 368 complaint, be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 369 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 370 Constitution until the investigation or examination ceases to be 371 active. The Legislature further finds that such information 372 should remain confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida 373 Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution 374 after the investigation or examination ceases to be active if 375 its disclosure would jeopardize the officeâs investigations by 376 revealing techniques or procedures or otherwise reveal 377 information that is being used in another investigation, or if 378 disclosure would reveal personal financial information or a 379 confidential source. 380 (b)âIt is a public necessity that trade secrets or personal 381 financial information obtained by the office in the course of an 382 investigation or examination pursuant to chapter 560, Florida 383 Statutes, be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 384 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 385 Constitution, unless an administrative law judge or circuit 386 judge determines that the release of personal financial 387 information to the public is in the interest of justice. 388 (2)âInformation specified in paragraphs (1)(a) and (b) is 389 held by the office in conjunction with its investigations and 390 examinations of money services businesses, which include virtual 391 currency kiosk businesses, as defined in s. 560.103, Florida 392 Statutes, as amended by chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida. 393 Virtual currency kiosk businesses are thus subject to 394 investigation or examination by the office. As a result, the 395 office may receive sensitive personal and financial information 396 relating to such entities in conjunction with its duties under 397 chapter 560, Florida Statutes. An exemption from public records 398 requirements provides the same protections to virtual currency 399 kiosk businesses as are afforded to other money services 400 businesses, thereby preventing any disadvantage to these 401 similarly regulated entities in comparison to other entities 402 currently classified as money services businesses. An exemption 403 from public records requirements for reports of examinations, 404 operations, or condition, including working papers, is necessary 405 to ensure the officeâs ability to effectively and efficiently 406 administer its examination and investigation duties. Examination 407 and investigation are essential components of financial 408 institutions regulation. They deter fraud and ensure the safety 409 and soundness of the financial system. Examinations and 410 investigations also provide a means of early detection of 411 violations, allowing for corrective action to be taken before 412 any harm can be done. Release of such information could 413 compromise the officeâs examinations or investigations, reveal 414 investigative techniques, or result in the disclosure of an 415 individualâs personal financial information. Such disclosure 416 could also result in the release of inaccurate information, 417 which could harm the subject of the examination or 418 investigation, or otherwise impair commerce relating to money 419 services businesses. The Legislature finds that there is little 420 public benefit derived from access to such information during 421 the officeâs examinations or investigations, and that the 422 exemption is narrowly tailored to allow for release except where 423 the public benefit is outweighed by harm to either the officeâs 424 investigations or examinations or to individuals whose personal 425 financial information may be disclosed. 426 (3)âThis section shall take effect on the same date that SB 427 198 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation is 428 adopted in the same legislative session or an extension thereof 429 and becomes a law. 430 Section 10.â(1)âThe Legislature finds all of the 431 following: 432 (a)âIt is a public necessity that all information 433 concerning an investigation or examination of a money services 434 business conducted by the Office of Financial Regulation 435 pursuant to chapter 560, Florida Statutes, including a consumer 436 complaint, be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 437 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 438 Constitution until the investigation or examination ceases to be 439 active. The Legislature further finds that such information 440 should remain confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida 441 Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution 442 after the investigation or examination ceases to be active if 443 its disclosure would jeopardize the officeâs investigations or 444 examinations by revealing techniques or procedures or otherwise 445 reveal information that is being used in another investigation 446 or examinations, or if disclosure would reveal personal 447 financial information or a confidential source. 448 (b)âIt is a public necessity that trade secrets or personal 449 financial information obtained by the office in the course of an 450 investigation or examination pursuant to chapter 560, Florida 451 Statutes, be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 452 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 453 Constitution, unless an administrative law judge or circuit 454 judge determines that the release of personal financial 455 information to the public is in the interest of justice. 456 (2)âInformation specified in paragraphs (1)(a) and (b) is 457 held by the office in conjunction with its investigations and 458 examinations of money services businesses, which include 459 qualified payment stablecoin issuers, as defined in s. 560.103, 460 Florida Statutes, as amended by chapter 2025-100, Laws of 461 Florida. Qualified payment stablecoin issuers are thus subject 462 to investigation or examination by the office. As a result, the 463 office may receive sensitive personal and financial information 464 relating to such entities in conjunction with its duties under 465 chapter 560, Florida Statutes. An exemption from public records 466 requirements provides the same protections to qualified payment 467 stablecoin issuers as are afforded to other money services 468 businesses, thereby preventing any disadvantage to these 469 similarly regulated entities in comparison to other entities 470 currently classified as money services businesses. An exemption 471 from public records requirements for reports of examinations, 472 operations, or condition, including working papers, is necessary 473 to ensure the officeâs ability to effectively and efficiently 474 administer its examination and investigation duties. Examination 475 and investigation are essential components of financial 476 institutions regulation. They deter fraud and ensure the safety 477 and soundness of the financial system. Examinations and 478 investigations also provide a means of early detection of 479 violations, allowing for corrective action to be taken before 480 any harm can be done. Release of such information could 481 compromise the officeâs examinations or investigations, reveal 482 investigative techniques, or result in the disclosure of an 483 individualâs personal financial information. Such disclosure 484 could also result in the release of inaccurate information, 485 which could harm the subject of the examination or 486 investigation, or otherwise impair commerce relating to money 487 services businesses. The Legislature finds that there is little 488 public benefit derived from access to such information during 489 the officeâs examinations or investigations, and that the 490 exemption is narrowly tailored to allow for release except where 491 the public benefit is outweighed by harm to either the officeâs 492 investigations or examinations or to individuals whose personal 493 financial information may be disclosed. 494 (3)âThis section shall take effect on the same date that SB 495 314 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation is 496 adopted in the same legislative session or an extension thereof 497 and becomes a law. 498 Section 11.âSubsection (6) is added to section 655.0171, 499 Florida Statutes, as created by SB 540, 2026 Regular Session, to 500 read: 501 655.0171âRequirements for customer data security and for 502 notices of security breaches.â 503 (6)âPUBLIC RECORDS EXEMPTION.â 504 (a)âAll information received by the office pursuant to a 505 notification required by this section, or received by the office 506 pursuant to an investigation by the office or a law enforcement 507 agency under this section, is confidential and exempt from s. 508 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 509 Information received by the office pursuant to an investigation 510 by the office or a law enforcement agency under this section 511 shall remain confidential and exempt until such time as the 512 investigation is completed or ceases to be active. This 513 exemption shall be construed in conformity with s. 514 119.071(2)(c). 515 (b)âDuring an active investigation, information made 516 confidential and exempt pursuant to paragraph (a) may be 517 disclosed by the office: 518 1.âIn the furtherance of its official duties and 519 responsibilities; 520 2.âFor print, publication, or broadcast if the office 521 determines that such release would assist in notifying the 522 public or locating or identifying a person that the office 523 believes to be a victim of a data breach or improper disposal of 524 customer records, except that information made confidential and 525 exempt by paragraph (c) may not be released pursuant to this 526 subparagraph; or 527 3.âTo another governmental entity in the furtherance of its 528 official duties and responsibilities. 529 (c)âUpon completion of an investigation or once an 530 investigation ceases to be active, the following information 531 received by the office remains confidential and exempt from s. 532 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 533 1.âAll information to which another public records 534 exemption applies. 535 2.âPersonal information. 536 3.âA computer forensic report. 537 4.âInformation that would otherwise reveal weaknesses in a 538 financial institutionâs data security. 539 5.âInformation that would disclose a financial 540 institutionâs proprietary information. 541 a.âAs used in this subparagraph, the term âproprietary 542 informationâ means information that: 543 (I)âIs owned or controlled by the financial institution. 544 (II)âIs intended to be private and is treated by the 545 financial institution as private because disclosure would harm 546 the financial institution or its business operations. 547 (III)âHas not been disclosed except as required by law or a 548 private agreement that provides that the information will not be 549 released to the public. 550 (IV)âIs not publicly available or otherwise readily 551 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the 552 same configuration as received by the office. 553 b.âThe term âproprietary informationâ includes: 554 (I)âTrade secrets as defined in s. 688.002. 555 (II)âCompetitive interests, the disclosure of which would 556 impair the competitive business of the financial institution 557 that is the subject of the information. 558 (d)âAs used in this subsection, the term âcustomer recordsâ 559 means any material, regardless of the physical form, on which 560 personal information is recorded or preserved by any means, 561 including, but not limited to, written or spoken words, 562 graphically depicted, printed, or electromagnetically 563 transmitted, which is provided by an individual in this state to 564 a financial institution for the purpose of purchasing or leasing 565 a product or obtaining a service. 566 (e)âThis subsection is subject to the Open Government 567 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 568 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 569 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 570 Section 12.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 571 necessity that all information received by the Office of 572 Financial Regulation pursuant to a notification of a violation 573 of s. 655.0171, Florida Statutes, or received by the Department 574 of Legal Affairs pursuant to an investigation by the department 575 or a law enforcement agency relating to a violation of s. 576 655.0171, Florida Statutes, be made confidential and exempt from 577 s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 578 State Constitution for the following reasons: 579 (1)âA notification of a violation of s. 655.0171, Florida 580 Statutes, is likely to result in an investigation. The premature 581 release of such information could frustrate or thwart the 582 investigation and impair the ability of the office to 583 effectively and efficiently administer s. 655.0171, Florida 584 Statutes. In addition, release of such information before 585 completion of an active investigation could jeopardize the 586 ongoing investigation. 587 (2)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public necessity to 588 continue to protect from public disclosure all information to 589 which another public record exemption applies once an 590 investigation is completed or ceases to be active. Release of 591 such information by the office would undo the specific statutory 592 exemption protecting that information. 593 (3)âAn investigation of a data breach or improper disposal 594 of customer records is likely to result in the gathering of 595 sensitive personal information, including social security 596 numbers, identification numbers, and personal financial 597 information of customers of financial institutions. Such 598 information could be used for the purpose of identity theft, and 599 release of such information could subject possible victims of 600 the data breach or improper disposal of customer records to 601 further financial harm. 602 (4)âRelease of a computer forensic report or other 603 information that would otherwise reveal weaknesses in a covered 604 financial institutionâs data security could compromise the 605 future security of that financial institution, or other 606 financial institutions, if such information were available upon 607 conclusion of an investigation or once an investigation ceased 608 to be active. The release of such report or information could 609 compromise the security of current financial institutions and 610 make those financial institutions susceptible to future data 611 breaches. Release of such report or information could result in 612 the identification of vulnerabilities and further breaches of 613 that system. 614 (5)âNotices received by the office and information received 615 during an investigation of a data breach are likely to contain 616 proprietary information, including trade secrets, about the 617 security of the breached system. The release of the proprietary 618 information could result in the identification of 619 vulnerabilities and further breaches of that system. In 620 addition, a trade secret derives independent, economic value, 621 actual or potential, from being generally unknown to, and not 622 readily ascertainable by, other persons. Allowing public access 623 to proprietary information, including a trade secret, through a 624 public records request could destroy the value of the 625 proprietary information and cause a financial loss to the 626 financial institution submitting the information. Release of 627 such information could give business competitors an unfair 628 advantage in the marketplace and weaken the position of the 629 financial institution supplying the proprietary information. 630 Section 13.âSubsection (5) of section 655.057, Florida 631 Statutes, is amended to read: 632 655.057âRecords; limited restrictions upon public access.â 633 (5)(a)âThe following information received by the office 634 pursuant to an application for authority to organize a new state 635 bank or new state trust company under chapter 658, or pursuant 636 to an application for authority to organize a new state credit 637 union under chapter 657, is confidential and exempt from s. 638 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 639 1.âPersonal financial information. 640 2.âA driver license number, a passport number, a military 641 identification number, or any other number or code issued on a 642 government document used to verify identity. 643 3.âBooks and records of a current or proposed financial 644 institution. 645 4.âThe proposed state bankâs, or proposed state trust 646 companyâs, or proposed state credit unionâs proposed business 647 plan. 648 (b)âThe personal identifying information of a proposed 649 officer or proposed director who is currently employed by, or 650 actively participates in the affairs of, another financial 651 institution received by the office pursuant to an application 652 for authority to organize a new state bank or new state trust 653 company under chapter 658, or pursuant to an application for 654 authority to organize a new state credit union under chapter 655 657, is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the 656 State Constitution until the application is approved and the 657 charter is issued. As used in this paragraph, the term âpersonal 658 identifying informationâ means names, home addresses, e-mail 659 addresses, telephone numbers, names of relatives, work 660 experience, professional licensing and educational backgrounds, 661 and photographs. 662 (c)âThis subsection is subject to the Open Government 663 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and is repealed 664 October 2, 2031 2029, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 665 through reenactment by the Legislature. 666 Section 14.â(1)(a)âThe Legislature finds that it is a 667 public necessity that information received by the Office of 668 Financial Regulation pursuant to an application for authority to 669 organize a new state credit union under chapter 657, Florida 670 Statutes, be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 671 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 672 Constitution to the extent that disclosure would reveal: 673 1.âPersonal financial information; 674 2.âA driver license number, a passport number, a military 675 identification number, or any other number or code issued on a 676 government document used to verify identity; 677 3.âBooks and records of a current or proposed financial 678 institution; or 679 4.âA proposed new state credit unionâs business plan and 680 any attached supporting documentation. 681 (b)âThe Legislature further finds that it is a public 682 necessity that the personal identifying information of a 683 proposed officer or proposed director who is currently employed 684 by, or actively participates in the affairs of, another 685 financial institution which is received by the office pursuant 686 to an application for authority to organize a new state credit 687 union under chapter 657, Florida Statutes, be made confidential 688 and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 689 Article I of the State Constitution for the duration of the 690 application process, until the application is approved and a 691 charter is issued. 692 (2)âThe office may receive sensitive personal, financial, 693 and business information in conjunction with its duties related 694 to the review of applications for the organization or 695 establishment of new state credit unions. The exemptions from 696 public records requirements provided under subsection (1) are 697 necessary to ensure the officeâs ability to administer its 698 regulatory duties while preventing unwarranted damage to the 699 proposed state credit unions or certain proposed officers or 700 proposed directors of new state credit unions in this state. The 701 release of information that could lead to the identification of 702 an individual involved in the potential establishment of a new 703 state credit union may subject such individual to retribution 704 and jeopardize his or her current employment with, or 705 participation in the affairs of, another financial institution. 706 Thus, the public availability of such information has a chilling 707 effect on the establishment of new state credit unions. Further, 708 the public availability of the books and financial records of a 709 current or proposed state credit union presents an unnecessary 710 risk of harm to the business operations of such credit union. 711 Finally, the public availability of a proposed state credit 712 unionâs business plan may cause competitive harm to its future 713 business operations and presents an unfair competitive advantage 714 for existing state credit unions that are not required to 715 release such information. 716 Section 15.âEffective on the same date that SB 314 or 717 similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation is adopted 718 in the same legislative session or an extension thereof and 719 becomes a law, subsection (15) is added to section 655.057, 720 Florida Statutes, and subsections (1) through (4), (6), and (10) 721 of that section are reenacted, to read: 722 655.057âRecords; limited restrictions upon public access.â 723 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section and except 724 for such portions thereof which are otherwise public record, all 725 records and information relating to an investigation by the 726 office are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 727 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until such investigation 728 is completed or ceases to be active. For purposes of this 729 subsection, an investigation is considered âactiveâ while such 730 investigation is being conducted by the office with a 731 reasonable, good faith belief that it may lead to the filing of 732 administrative, civil, or criminal proceedings. An investigation 733 does not cease to be active if the office is proceeding with 734 reasonable dispatch, and there is a good faith belief that 735 action may be initiated by the office or other administrative or 736 law enforcement agency. After an investigation is completed or 737 ceases to be active, portions of the records relating to the 738 investigation are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 739 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution to the extent that 740 disclosure would: 741 (a)âJeopardize the integrity of another active 742 investigation; 743 (b)âImpair the safety and soundness of the financial 744 institution; 745 (c)âReveal personal financial information; 746 (d)âReveal the identity of a confidential source; 747 (e)âDefame or cause unwarranted damage to the good name or 748 reputation of an individual or jeopardize the safety of an 749 individual; or 750 (f)âReveal investigative techniques or procedures. 751 (2)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section and except 752 for such portions thereof which are public record, reports of 753 examinations, operations, or condition, including working 754 papers, or portions thereof, prepared by, or for the use of, the 755 office or any state or federal agency responsible for the 756 regulation or supervision of financial institutions in this 757 state are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 758 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. However, such reports 759 or papers or portions thereof may be released to: 760 (a)âThe financial institution under examination; 761 (b)âAny holding company of which the financial institution 762 is a subsidiary; 763 (c)âProposed purchasers if necessary to protect the 764 continued financial viability of the financial institution, upon 765 prior approval by the board of directors of such institution; 766 (d)âPersons proposing in good faith to acquire a 767 controlling interest in or to merge with the financial 768 institution, upon prior approval by the board of directors of 769 such financial institution; 770 (e)âAny officer, director, committee member, employee, 771 attorney, auditor, or independent auditor officially connected 772 with the financial institution, holding company, proposed 773 purchaser, or person seeking to acquire a controlling interest 774 in or merge with the financial institution; or 775 (f)âA fidelity insurance company, upon approval of the 776 financial institutionâs board of directors. However, a fidelity 777 insurance company may receive only that portion of an 778 examination report relating to a claim or investigation being 779 conducted by such fidelity insurance company. 780 (g)âExamination, operation, or condition reports of a 781 financial institution shall be released by the office within 1 782 year after the appointment of a liquidator, receiver, or 783 conservator to the financial institution. However, any portion 784 of such reports which discloses the identities of depositors, 785 bondholders, members, borrowers, or stockholders, other than 786 directors, officers, or controlling stockholders of the 787 institution, shall remain confidential and exempt from s. 788 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 789 790 Any confidential information or records obtained from the office 791 pursuant to this subsection shall be maintained as confidential 792 and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 793 Constitution. 794 (3)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section and except 795 for those portions that are otherwise public record, after an 796 investigation relating to an informal enforcement action is 797 completed or ceases to be active, informal enforcement actions 798 are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. 799 I of the State Constitution to the extent that disclosure would: 800 (a)âJeopardize the integrity of another active 801 investigation. 802 (b)âImpair the safety and soundness of the financial 803 institution. 804 (c)âReveal personal financial information. 805 (d)âReveal the identity of a confidential source. 806 (e)âDefame or cause unwarranted damage to the good name or 807 reputation of an individual or jeopardize the safety of an 808 individual. 809 (f)âReveal investigative techniques or procedures. 810 (4)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section and except 811 for those portions that are otherwise public record, trade 812 secrets as defined in s. 688.002 which comply with s. 655.0591 813 and which are held by the office in accordance with its 814 statutory duties with respect to the financial institutions 815 codes are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 816 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 817 (6)âThis section does not prevent or restrict: 818 (a)âPublishing reports that are required to be submitted to 819 the office pursuant to s. 655.045(2) or required by applicable 820 federal statutes or regulations to be published. 821 (b)âFurnishing records or information to any other state, 822 federal, or foreign agency responsible for the regulation or 823 supervision of financial institutions. 824 (c)âDisclosing or publishing summaries of the condition of 825 financial institutions and general economic and similar 826 statistics and data, provided that the identity of a particular 827 financial institution is not disclosed. 828 (d)âReporting any suspected criminal activity, with 829 supporting documents and information, to appropriate law 830 enforcement and prosecutorial agencies. 831 (e)âFurnishing information upon request to the Chief 832 Financial Officer or the Division of Treasury of the Department 833 of Financial Services regarding the financial condition of any 834 financial institution that is, or has applied to be, designated 835 as a qualified public depository pursuant to chapter 280. 836 (f)âFurnishing information to Federal Home Loan Banks 837 regarding its member institutions pursuant to an information 838 sharing agreement between the Federal Home Loan Banks and the 839 office. 840 841 Any confidential information or records obtained from the office 842 pursuant to this subsection shall be maintained as confidential 843 and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 844 Constitution. 845 (10)âMaterials supplied to the office or to employees of 846 any financial institution by other state or federal governmental 847 agencies remain the property of the submitting agency or the 848 corporation, and any document request must be made to the 849 appropriate agency. Any confidential documents supplied to the 850 office or to employees of any financial institution by other 851 state or federal governmental agencies are confidential and 852 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 853 Constitution. Such information shall be made public only with 854 the consent of such agency or the corporation. 855 (15)âSubsections (1)-(4), (6), and (10) are subject to the 856 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 857 and are repealed October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 858 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 859 Section 16.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 860 necessity that all records and information relating to an 861 investigation by the Office of Financial Regulation undertaken 862 pursuant to chapter 655, Florida Statutes, be made confidential 863 and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 864 Article I of the State Constitution until the investigation 865 ceases to be active. The Legislature further finds that such 866 information should remain confidential and exempt from s. 867 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 868 State Constitution after the investigation ceases to be active 869 if its disclosure would jeopardize the officeâs investigations 870 by revealing techniques or procedures, or otherwise reveal 871 information that is being used in another investigation; reveal 872 personal financial information or a confidential source; or 873 defame or cause unwarranted damage to an individualâs reputation 874 or jeopardize his or her safety. 875 (2)âInformation specified in s. 655.057(1)-(4), (6), and 876 (10), Florida Statutes, is held by the office in conjunction 877 with examinations and investigations of trust companies which 878 may include records concerning payment stablecoin issuer 879 products or services offered by such trust companies, as 880 authorized in s. 658.997, Florida Statutes. As a result, the 881 office may receive sensitive personal and financial information 882 relating to such trust companies in conjunction with its duties 883 under chapter 655, Florida Statutes. An exemption from public 884 records requirements provides the same protections to trust 885 companies that are qualified payment stablecoin issuers as are 886 afforded to other financial institutions, thereby preventing any 887 disadvantage to these similarly regulated entities in comparison 888 to other entities currently classified as financial 889 institutions. An exemption from public records requirements for 890 reports of examinations, operations, or condition, including 891 working papers, is necessary to ensure the officeâs ability to 892 effectively and efficiently administer its examination and 893 investigation duties. Examination and investigation are 894 essential components of financial institutions regulation. They 895 deter fraud and ensure the safety and soundness of the financial 896 system. Examinations and investigations also provide a means of 897 early detection of violations, allowing for corrective action to 898 be taken before any harm can be done. 899 (3)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public necessity to 900 make confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida 901 Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution 902 records and information relating to an examination or 903 investigation by the Office of Financial Regulation; portions of 904 records relating to a completed or inactive examination or 905 investigation by the office which would jeopardize the integrity 906 of another active examination or investigation, impair the 907 safety and soundness of the financial institution, reveal 908 personal financial information, reveal the identity of a 909 confidential source, defame or cause unwarranted damage to the 910 good name or reputation of an individual or jeopardize the 911 safety of an individual, or reveal investigative techniques or 912 procedures; reports of examinations, operations, or conditions, 913 including working papers, or portions thereof, prepared by, or 914 for the use of, the office or any state or federal agency 915 responsible for the regulation or supervision of financial 916 institutions in this state, until 1 year after the appointment 917 of a liquidator; any portion of such reports which discloses the 918 identities of depositors, bondholders, members, borrowers, or 919 stockholders, other than directors, officers, or controlling 920 stockholders of the institution; trade secrets held by the 921 office in accordance with its statutory duties under chapter 922 655, Florida Statutes, unless an administrative law judge or 923 circuit judge determines that the release of personal financial 924 information to the public is in the interest of justice; and 925 materials supplied to the office or to employees of any 926 financial institution by other state or federal governmental 927 agencies. 928 (4)âRelease of information specified in s. 655.057(1)-(4), 929 (6), and (10), Florida Statutes, could compromise the officeâs 930 examinations and investigations, reveal investigative 931 techniques, result in the disclosure of an individualâs personal 932 financial information, or defame or cause unwarranted damage to 933 the good name or reputation of an individual or entity or 934 jeopardize his or her safety. Such disclosure could also result 935 in the spread of inaccurate information, which could harm the 936 subject of the examination or investigation, or otherwise impair 937 commerce conducted by financial institutions in this state. Any 938 portion of a record or information relating to an examination or 939 investigation which reveals personal financial information or 940 the identity of a confidential source may defame, or cause 941 unwarranted damage to the good name or reputation of, those 942 individuals, or jeopardize their safety. 943 (5)âA trade secret derives independent economic value, 944 actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not 945 readily ascertainable by, other persons who can obtain economic 946 value from the disclosure or use of the trade secret. Without an 947 exemption for a trade secret held by the office in accordance 948 with its duties prescribed by chapter 655, Florida Statutes, 949 that trade secret becomes a public record when received and must 950 be divulged upon request. Divulging a trade secret under the 951 public records law would give business competitors an unfair 952 advantage and destroy the value of that property, causing a 953 financial loss to the person or entity submitting the trade 954 secret and weakening the position of that person or entity in 955 the marketplace. 956 (6)âThe Legislature finds that there is little public 957 benefit derived from access to such information during the 958 officeâs examinations or investigations, and that the exemption 959 is narrowly tailored to allow for release except where the 960 public benefit is outweighed by harm to individuals or 961 institutions, when the disclosure would jeopardize other 962 examinations or investigations, reveal the officeâs 963 investigative techniques or procedures, or expose personal 964 financial information or a confidential source. 965 (7)âThis section shall take effect on the same date that SB 966 314 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation is 967 adopted in the same legislative session or an extension thereof 968 and becomes a law. 969 Section 17.âEffective on the same date that SB 314 or 970 similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation is adopted 971 in the same legislative session or an extension thereof and 972 becomes a law, subsection (7) of section 655.50, Florida 973 Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (d) of subsection (5) of 974 this section is reenacted, to read: 975 655.50âFlorida Control of Money Laundering and Terrorist 976 Financing in Financial Institutions Act.â 977 (5)âA financial institution shall keep a record of each 978 financial transaction occurring in this state known to it which 979 involves currency or other monetary instrument, as the 980 commission prescribes by rule, has a value greater than $10,000, 981 and involves the proceeds of specified unlawful activity, or is 982 designed to evade the reporting requirements of this section, 983 chapter 896, or similar state or federal law, or which the 984 financial institution reasonably believes is suspicious 985 activity. Each financial institution shall maintain appropriate 986 procedures to ensure compliance with this section, chapter 896, 987 and other similar state or federal law. Any report of suspicious 988 activity made pursuant to this subsection is entitled to the 989 same confidentiality provided under 31 C.F.R. s. 1020.320, 990 whether the report or information pertaining to or identifying 991 the report is in the possession or control of the office or the 992 reporting institution. 993 (d)âEach financial institution shall file a report of the 994 records required under this subsection with the office. Each 995 report shall be filed at such time and must contain such 996 information as the commission requires by rule. 997 (7)âAll reports and records filed with the office pursuant 998 to this section are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) 999 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. However, the 1000 office shall provide any report filed pursuant to this section, 1001 or information contained therein, to federal, state, and local 1002 law enforcement and prosecutorial agencies, and any federal or 1003 state agency responsible for the regulation or supervision of 1004 financial institutions. 1005 Section 18.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 1006 necessity that all reports and records filed with the Office of 1007 Financial Regulation be made confidential and exempt from s. 1008 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 1009 State Constitution unless disclosure is requested by a federal, 1010 state, or local law enforcement or prosecutorial agency or any 1011 federal or state agency responsible for the regulation or 1012 supervision of financial institutions. Information regarding 1013 potential money laundering or terrorism must be safeguarded to 1014 prevent the potential offender from being tipped off or 1015 circumventing an investigation conducted by the office, and 1016 disclosure of such information could harm the officeâs 1017 investigations. 1018 (2)âThese reports and records are held by the office in 1019 conjunction with its duties pursuant to 31 U.S.C. s. 5313 and 31 1020 C.F.R. part 1020 and its examinations or investigations of trust 1021 companiesâ transactions involving monetary instruments 1022 concerning payment stablecoin products or services offered by 1023 such companies, as authorized in s. 658.997, Florida Statutes, 1024 to include any transactions involving payment stablecoin 1025 products or services offered by such financial institutions. As 1026 a result, the office may receive sensitive personal and 1027 financial information relating to such entities in conjunction 1028 with its duties under chapter 655, Florida Statutes. An 1029 exemption from public records requirements provides the same 1030 protections to trust companies that hold a certificate of 1031 authority as a qualified payment stablecoin issuer as are 1032 afforded to other financial institutions, thereby preventing any 1033 disadvantage to these similarly regulated entities in comparison 1034 to other entities currently classified as financial 1035 institutions. An exemption from public records requirements for 1036 reports and records submitted to the office is necessary to 1037 ensure the officeâs ability to effectively and efficiently 1038 administer its investigation duties. Examination and 1039 investigation are essential components of financial institutions 1040 regulation. They deter fraud and ensure the safety and soundness 1041 of the financial system. Examinations and investigations also 1042 provide a means of early detection of violations, allowing for 1043 corrective action to be taken before any harm can be done. 1044 (3)âThis section shall take effect on the same date that SB 1045 314 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation is 1046 adopted in the same legislative session or an extension thereof 1047 and becomes a law. 1048 Section 19.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 1049 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon 1050 becoming a law, this act shall take effect on the same date that 1051 SB 540 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 1052 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 1053 thereof and becomes a law.